Texas, session 892, SB53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 15.025(a), Election Code, as effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Except as provided by Subsections (b) and[,] (d)[, and (e)], the registration of a voter described by this subsection whose information is changed on the registration records becomes effective as to the change on the 30th day after: (1)  the date the voter submits to the registrar a notice of a change in registration information under Section 15.021 or a response under Section 15.053, indicating the change; or (2)  the date the voter submits a statement of residence to an election officer under Section 63.0011 or a registration application or change of address to an agency employee under Chapter 20, indicating the change. SECTION 2.  Section 63.0011, Election Code, as effective September 1, 2025, is amended by amending Subsections (b) and (c) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b)  If the voter's residence address is not current because the voter has changed residence within the county, the voter may vote, if otherwise eligible, in the election precinct in which the voter is registered [resides] if the voter resides in the county in which the voter is registered. (b-1)  A voter accepted for voting under Subsection (b) may only cast a provisional ballot under Section 63.011 and may only vote on each office or proposition stating a measure to be voted on countywide. (c)  Before being accepted for voting, the voter must execute and submit to an election officer a statement including: (1)  a statement that the voter satisfies the applicable residence requirements [requirement] prescribed by Subsection (b); (2)  all of the information that a person must include in an application to register to vote under Section 13.002; and (3)  the date the statement is submitted to the election officer[; and [(4)  a request to the registrar to change the voter's registration address to the address at which the voter resides]. SECTION 3.  Section 63.011(a), Election Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A person to whom Section 63.001(g), 63.0011(b-1), or 63.009 applies may cast a provisional ballot if the person executes an affidavit stating that the person: (1)  is a registered voter in the precinct in which the person seeks to vote; and (2)  is eligible to vote in the election. SECTION 4.  Section 15.025(e), Election Code, as effective September 1, 2025, is repealed. SECTION 5.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to a notice of a voter's change of address submitted on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 6.  Section 63.0011, Election Code, as amended by this Act, applies only to an election ordered on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 7.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.